Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5870.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 510. (1) The ninth judicial circuit consists of the county of Kalamazoo and has 5 6 judges. (2) Subject to section 550, this judicial circuit may have 1 additional judge effective January 1, 2025. If this judgeship is added to the ninth judicial circuit, the initial term of office of the judgeship is 8 years.beginning January 1, 2027. Sec. 8117. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), the The eighth district consists of the county of Kalamazoo, is a district of the first class, and has 7 6 judges. (2) Beginning on the earlier of the following dates, the eighth district has 6 judges: (a) The date on which a vacancy occurs in the office of district judge in the eighth district. (b) The beginning date of the term for which an incumbent district judge in the eighth district no longer seeks election or reelection to that office.Subject to section 8175, the eighth district may have 1 additional judge beginning January 1, 2027.